Hawaii statutes.
§712-1244 Promoting a harmful drug in the
first degree. (1) A person commits the offense of promoting a harmful
drug in the first degree if the person knowingly:

(a) Possesses one hundred or more capsules or
tablets or dosage units containing one or more of the harmful drugs or one or
more of the marijuana concentrates, or any combination thereof;

(b) Possesses one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances, of an aggregate weight of one ounce or more containing
one or more of the harmful drugs or one or more of the marijuana concentrates,
or any combination thereof;

(c) Distributes twenty-five or more capsules or
tablets or dosage units containing one or more of the harmful drugs or one or
more of the marijuana concentrates, or any combination thereof;

(d) Distributes one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances, of an aggregate weight of one- eighth ounce or more,
containing one or more of the harmful drugs or one or more of the marijuana
concentrates, or any combination thereof; or

(e) Distributes any harmful drug or any marijuana
concentrate in any amount to a minor.

(2) Promoting a harmful drug in the first
degree is a class A felony. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 119, §1 and c
163, §6(f); am L 1979, c 105, §66; am L 1981, c 31, §2; am L 1989, c 163, §3;
gen ch 1992]

Revision Note

In subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c), "or" deleted
pursuant to §23G-15.

Case Notes

Subsection (1)(d) not void for vagueness with respect to
hashish; statutory classification of hashish as a harmful drug did not violate
equal protection. 65 H. 174, 649 P.2d 381 (1982).

Chain of custody requirements. 1 H. App. 546, 622 P.2d 620
(1981).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next